Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.32, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Advertisement for bids. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may conduct the work or any part of the work incidental to the construction and maintenance of the trunk highways by labor employed to do the work or by contract. new text begin (b) new text end In cases of construction work, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end first advertise for bids for contracts, and if no satisfactory bids are received, may either reject all bids and readvertise, or do the work by labor employed to do the work. Except as provided in subdivision 3 or 4, when work is to be done under contract, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end advertise for bids once each week for three successive weeks prior to the date the bids are to be received.new text begin Except as provided in subdivision 3 or 4, for a construction project, the commissioner must establish a date to commence construction work that is at least 180 days after the date of a contract award.new text end The advertisement for bids must be published on the Internet. The plans and specifications for the proposed work must be on file in the commissioner's office prior to the first call for bids. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for bids first advertised on or after October 1, 2026. new text end